Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 13.1-1007.
Unlawful to transact or offer to transact business as a limited liability company unless authorized.

It shall be unlawful for any person to transact business in this Commonwealth as a limited liability company or to offer or advertise to transact business in this Commonwealth as a limited liability company unless the alleged limited liability company is either a domestic limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1991, c. 168; 2013, c. 17.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 17 inserted “limited” following “domestic” in the first sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Limited Liability Companies, §§ 2-4.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Contract entered into prior to limited liability company’s formal incorporation. —

A limited liability company’s contract with the foundation was valid, as such signed by one of the proposed principals and incorporators 12 days prior to the LLC obtaining its corporate status in Virginia. Geographic Network Affiliates-Int'l, Inc. v. Enter. for Empowerment Found., 68 Va. Cir. 185, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 237 (Norfolk June 27, 2005).

Standing to sue. —

Operating agreement showed the parties’ intent to operate a business together as a limited liability company or a business as a partnership up to the time the limited liability company came into being; thus, when the investor wrote checks, the funds became the property of the business entity. A cause of action for conversion would require that the entity in place that received the funds be named, and a recovery by that entity, the limited liability company, by way of a derivative claim, would then be distributable to the members according to their interests; therefore, the investor had no standing to sue for conversion under §

13.1-1007

because the funds alleged to have been converted belonged to the business entity after the investor wrote four checks payable to the entity, which was operating either as a partnership or a limited liability company. Schur v. Sprenkle, 84 Va. Cir. 418, 2012 Va. Cir. LEXIS 132 (Richmond Apr. 11, 2012).